test/tools/stress.random-lexicons-100.lexc
LEXICON V77	
+V77:bldc	Modes ;
+V77:beoh	Modes ;
+V77:bkkf	Modes ;
+V77:brpr	Modes ;
+V77:badb	Modes ;
+V77:bxhä	Modes ;
+V77:bökh	Modes ;
+V77:bqvd	Modes ;
+V77:bwwh	Modes ;
+V77:bunj	Modes ;
+V77:bäöp	Modes ;
+V77:bwgh	Modes ;
+V77:bmde	Modes ;
+V77:bgzr	Modes ;
+V77:bgiz	Modes ;
+V77:bdip	Modes ;
+V77:bucå	Modes ;
+V77:bmöy	Modes ;
+V77:bnvä	Modes ;
+V77:brqt	Modes ;
+V77:bgsm	Modes ;
+V77:bbmg	Modes ;
+V77:bfåf	Modes ;
+V77:bxje	Modes ;
+V77:balu	Modes ;
+V77:bxeg	Modes ;
+V77:båse	Modes ;
+V77:beco	Modes ;
+V77:blhs	Modes ;
+V77:bbgx	Modes ;
+V77:bzes	Modes ;
+V77:bvig	Modes ;
+V77:bfws	Modes ;
+V77:bscr	Modes ;
+V77:bnhj	Modes ;
+V77:bwåa	Modes ;
+V77:bjou	Modes ;
+V77:btäf	Modes ;
+V77:bzhz	Modes ;
+V77:btpå	Modes ;
+V77:båat	Modes ;
+V77:bbkj	Modes ;
+V77:blro	Modes ;
+V77:bgwq	Modes ;
+V77:bnyg	Modes ;
+V77:bdsu	Modes ;
+V77:bödh	Modes ;
+V77:båsh	Modes ;
+V77:boäk	Modes ;
+V77:btar	Modes ;
+V77:beäh	Modes ;
+V77:bjka	Modes ;
+V77:bmtä	Modes ;
+V77:bxto	Modes ;
+V77:bguq	Modes ;
+V77:bwwj	Modes ;
+V77:bsrt	Modes ;
+V77:bqih	Modes ;
+V77:betm	Modes ;
+V77:bwxö	Modes ;
+V77:bvkr	Modes ;
+V77:bibg	Modes ;
+V77:bzrp	Modes ;
+V77:bmkr	Modes ;
+V77:bfmv	Modes ;
+V77:bjuö	Modes ;
+V77:bokk	Modes ;
+V77:brim	Modes ;
+V77:bywx	Modes ;
+V77:btmr	Modes ;
+V77:bixa	Modes ;
+V77:bnsb	Modes ;
+V77:beek	Modes ;
+V77:bvkz	Modes ;
+V77:bscv	Modes ;
+V77:btwm	Modes ;
+V77:bpuö	Modes ;
+V77:bålp	Modes ;
+V77:bjwz	Modes ;
+V77:bspo	Modes ;
+V77:bnfw	Modes ;
+V77:bjsa	Modes ;
+V77:bzkj	Modes ;
+V77:bzrö	Modes ;
+V77:bqtw	Modes ;
+V77:bqjs	Modes ;
+V77:bbdo	Modes ;
+V77:bvga	Modes ;
+V77:bdbf	Modes ;
+V77:bsät	Modes ;
+V77:brör	Modes ;
+V77:bwyö	Modes ;
+V77:blnx	Modes ;
+V77:bmoe	Modes ;
+V77:bnig	Modes ;
+V77:bpzp	Modes ;
+V77:bxqx	Modes ;
+V77:blvj	Modes ;
+V77:bvxj	Modes ;

LEXICON Cases
+ine:ssA	Possessives	;
+ela:stA	Possessives	;
+ade:llA	Possessives	;
+abl:llA	Possessives	;
+all:lle	Possessives	;
+abe:ttA	Possessives	;

LEXICON Possessives
+1sg:ni	Clitics	;
+2sg:si	Clitics	;
+1pl:mme	Clitics	;
+2pl:nne	Clitics	;
	Clitics	;

LEXICON Modes
+ind+pres:a	People	;
+ind+past:i	People	;
+cond:isi	People	;

LEXICON People
+1sg:n	Clitics	;
+2sg:t	Clitics	;
+1pl:mme	Clitics	;
+2pl:tte	Clitics	;

LEXICON Clitics
+clit:kO	#	;
+clit:pA	#	;
+clit:hAn	#	;
	#	;

LEXICON Root
t V77 ;
